Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
the sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used for the
Oklahoma State University Robert M. Kerr Food and Agricultural
Products Center for operational expenses.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
the sum of Five Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,200,000.00)
shall be used for the extension offices that are affiliated with the
Oklahoma State University Cooperative Extension Service.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
the sum of One Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars

($1,300,000.00) shall be used for research centers that are
affiliated with Oklahoma State University Agriculture Experiment
Stations.
SECTION 4. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
the sum of Eight Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($8,500,000.00) shall be used for the cooperative extension and
agriculture research programs that are affiliated with Langston
University.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1166 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1166 Page 3